District of Columbia statutes.
16-4604.10

Duration of abduction prevention order.

An abduction prevention order remains in effect until the earliest of:

(1)

The time stated in the order;

(2)

The emancipation of the child;

(3)

The child’s attaining 18 years of age; or

(4)

The time the order is modified, revoked, vacated, or superseded by a court with jurisdiction under §§ 16-4602.01 to 16-4602.03.

History

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-378, § 2(d), 56 DCR 1572

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 10 of the Uniform Child Abduction Prevention Act.